Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2704.02
Grants of assistance; engineering
and technical studies.

(1) The department shall use the fund to provide grants
of assistance for engineering and technical studies directly related to projects
described in section 13-2704.01.

(2) Applications
for grants of assistance pursuant to this section shall be evaluated by the
department pursuant to section 13-2707.01.

Laws 2013, LB153, § 6.